Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1932
Provisional license; period valid;
conversion to regular license.

A provisional license may be issued to an applicant for
an initial residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency that substantially
complies with requirements for licensure under the Children's Residential
Facilities and Placing Licensure Act and the rules and regulations adopted
and promulgated under the act if the failure to fully comply with such requirements
does not pose a danger to the children residing in or served by the residential
child-caring agency or child-placing agency. Such provisional license shall
be valid for a period of up to one year, shall not be renewed, and may be
converted to a regular license upon a showing that the agency fully complies
with the requirements for licensure under the act and rules and regulations.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 9.